Missouri, session 2026, SB1358.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 559.016 and 559.600, RSMo, are
repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as sections 559.016 and 559.600, to read as follows:
559.016. 1. Unless terminated as provided in section
559.036 or modified under section 217.703, the terms during
which each probation shall remain conditional and be subject
to revocation are:
(1) A term of years not less than one year and not to
exceed five years for a felony;
(2) A term not less than six months and not to exceed
[two years] eighteen months for a misdemeanor or municipal
ordinance violation;
(3) A term not less than six months and not to exceed
one year for an infraction.
2. The court shall designate a specific term of
probation at the time of sentencing or at the time of
suspension of imposition of sentence. Such term may be
modified by the division of probation and parole under
section 217.703.
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1358 2
3. The court may extend a period of probation[,];
however, no more than one extension of any probation may be
ordered, except that the court may extend the total time on
probation by one additional year by order of the court if
the defendant admits he or she has violated the conditions
of his or her probation or is found by the court to have
violated the conditions of his or her probation. Total time
on any probation term, including any extension, shall not
exceed the maximum term as established in subsection 1 of
this section plus one additional year if the defendant
admits or the court finds that the defendant has violated
the conditions of his or her probation.
559.600. 1. In cases where the division of probation
and parole is not required under section 217.750 to provide
probation supervision and rehabilitation services for
misdemeanor offenders, the circuit and associate circuit
judges in a circuit may contract with one or more private
entities or other court-approved entity to provide such
services. The court-approved entity, including private or
other entities, shall act as a misdemeanor probation office
in that circuit and shall, pursuant to the terms of the
contract, supervise persons placed on probation by the
judges for class A, B, C, and D misdemeanor offenses,
specifically including persons placed on probation for
violations of section 577.023. Nothing in sections 559.600
to 559.615 shall be construed to prohibit the division of
probation and parole, or the court, from supervising
misdemeanor offenders in a circuit where the judges have
entered into a contract with a probation entity.
2. In all cases, the entity providing such private
probation service shall utilize the cutoff concentrations
utilized by the department of corrections with regard to

SB 1358 3
drug and alcohol screening for clients assigned to such
entity. A drug test is positive if drug presence is at or
above the cutoff concentration or negative if no drug is
detected or if drug presence is below the cutoff
concentration. No client shall be required to submit to an
alcohol or drug test unless the client is on probation for
an offense that involved either alcohol or a controlled
substance or unless ordered by the judge for good cause
shown.
3. In all cases, the entity providing such private
probation service shall not require the clients assigned to
such entity to travel in excess of fifty miles in order to
attend their regular probation meetings.
✓